Louisiana, session 2026, HB122.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9074(E) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§9074. Spring Lake Subdivision Improvement District
* * *
E. Taxing authority. (1)(a) The city council governing authority of the city
of New Orleans is hereby authorized to may levy and collect the special taxes or
fees, as authorized by the Spring Lake Subdivision Improvement District, as
hereinafter specifically provided for a term not to exceed eight years, district. The
taxes or fees shall be levied and collected in the same manner and at the same time
as all other ad valorem taxes on property subject to taxation by the city are levied and
collected,. The governing authority of the city may levy a special ad valorem tax not
to exceed five mills or fees not to exceed two hundred dollars three hundred twenty-
five dollars per year upon all taxable real property situated within the boundaries of
the Spring Lake Subdivision Improvement District. The election on the question of
the imposition of the fee may be renewed subject to the provisions of this
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 122 ENROLLED
Subparagraph district. The tax or fee herein authorized in this Subsection shall be
levied and collected only after the question of its imposition has been submitted to
and approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district voting on the
question at a regularly scheduled primary or general election to be conducted in
accordance with the provisions of the Louisiana Election Code who vote on the
proposition at an election held for that purpose in accordance with the Louisiana
Election Code. The amount of the tax or fee may be changed by duly adopted
resolution of the board of commissioners, not to exceed the maximum amount
authorized in this Subsection. No such tax or fee shall be levied until a plan
requiring or requesting the levy of a tax or fee is finally and conclusively adopted in
accordance with the procedures prescribed in this Section.
(2) The tax or fee shall expire at the time provided in the proposition
authorizing the tax or fee, not to exceed eight years, but may be renewed if approved
by the voters in the manner provided in Paragraph (1) of this Subsection. If the tax
or fee is renewed, the term of the imposition of the tax or fee shall be as provided in
the proposition authorizing such renewal, not to exceed eight years.
(b)(3) The proceeds of said the tax or fee shall be used solely and exclusively
for the purposes and benefit of the district. The proceeds shall be paid over to the
Board of Liquidation, City Debt, day by day as the same are collected and received
by the appropriate officials of the city of New Orleans and maintained in a separate
account. The Spring Lake Subdivision Improvement District district shall provide
the Board of Liquidation, City Debt, the approved annual budget against which a
quarterly advance disbursement will be provided based on projected expenditures.
All such disbursements to the district and subsequent expenditures by the district
shall be reconciled quarterly. The proceeds shall be paid out by the Board of
Liquidation, City Debt, upon warrants or drafts drawn on the Board of Liquidation,
City Debt, by the appropriate officials of the city and the treasurer of the district and
shall be used by the district solely for the purposes provided in this Section. The city
may retain one percent of the amount collected as a collection fee.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 122 ENROLLED
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision in this Section to the contrary, no
tax or fee authorized in this Section shall be levied until the maximum amount of the
tax has been approved by a majority of the registered voters of the district voting on
the question at a regularly scheduled primary or general election conducted in
accordance with the Louisiana Election Code.
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.